test/src/morphology/N-kuot_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kuoţ: # Noun 65 'eng /est kott/fin' - full paradigm
     kuoţ+N+Sg+Nom: kuoţ
     kuoţ+N+Sg+Gen: kuoţ
     kuoţ+N+Sg+Par: kuoţţõ
     kuoţ+N+Sg+Dat: kuoţţõn
     kuoţ+N+Sg+Ins: kuoţţõks
     kuoţ+N+Sg+Ill: kuoţţõ
     kuoţ+N+Sg+Ela: kuoţštõ
     kuoţ+N+Pl+Nom: kuoţīd
     kuoţ+N+Pl+Gen: kuoţīd
     kuoţ+N+Pl+Par: kuoţīdi
     kuoţ+N+Pl+Dat: kuoţīdõn
     kuoţ+N+Pl+Ins: kuoţīdõks
     kuoţ+N+Pl+Ill: kuoţīž
     kuoţ+N+Pl+Ela: kuoţīst
